Washington statutes.
RCW 36.05.040

Questions of fact to be determined.

The boundaries of such territory, the number of voters living therein, and the sufficiency of such petition are questions of fact to be determined by the court.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.05.040. Prior: 1897 c 76 s 5; RRS s 3968.]